Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1875.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1289.32 of Title 21, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


No firearm manufacturer, weapons dealer, or citizen shall be


held liable for the misuse or self-defense use of a firearm that was


manufactured by the manufacturer, sold by the weapons dealer, or


possessed by the citizen.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3166 BLB 1/15/2026 8:17:32 AM





Req. No. 3166 Page 1